Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-906
Medical assistance;
state accepts federal provisions.

For purposes
of paying medical assistance under the Medical Assistance Act and sections
68-1002 and 68-1006, the State of Nebraska accepts and assents to all applicable
provisions of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.
Any reference in the Medical Assistance Act to the federal Social Security
Act or other acts or sections of federal law shall be to such federal acts
or sections as they existed on January 1, 2010.

Laws 1965, c. 397, § 6, p. 1278;

Laws 1993, LB 808, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 324;

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-1021;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 13.

This section requires the director of the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support to promulgate rules and policies implementing the Nebraska Medicaid program. Boruch v. Nebraska Dept. of Health and Human Servs., 11 Neb. App. 713, 659 N.W.2d 848 (2003).